Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,123.01
Commission; duty to provide information.

The commission shall provide copies of statements, reports, parts of reports, advisory opinions, and public information prepared by the commission to any person on request at a reasonable cost to be determined by the commission.

Laws 1989, LB 815, § 3.